Louisiana, session 2026, SB18.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:1762(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1762. Part-time reemployment of retirees
A.(1) Whenever a retiree receiving normal retirement benefits becomes
reemployed by an employer but the retiree does not meet the definition of an
employee and either his monthly earnings are equal to or less than the difference
between his monthly average final compensation and his monthly retirement benefit
or the retiree has more than thirty years of creditable service and is at least age sixty,
his retirement benefits shall continue without any reduction, his retirement benefits
shall continue, and the retiree shall not be a member of the system.
(2) Whenever a retiree who has thirty years or less of creditable service and
who is receiving normal retirement benefits becomes reemployed by an employer but
the retiree does not meet the definition of an employee and his monthly earnings
exceed the difference between his monthly average final compensation and his
monthly retirement benefit, his retirement benefits shall be reduced by the amount
that his monthly earnings exceed the difference between his monthly average final
compensation and his monthly retirement benefit for every month of such
employment, and the retiree shall not be a member of the system. The calculation of
monthly earnings shall not include income attributable to service as a part-time
elected official listed in R.S. 11:164.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 18 ENROLLED
* * *
Section 2. Section 2 of Act 634 of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature is
hereby repealed.
Section 3. A retiree serving as a part-time reemployed retiree under the provisions
of Act 634 of the 2024 Regular Session of the Legislature before July 1, 2026, may continue
to serve as a part-time reemployed retiree without any reduction in his retirement benefits
so long as his part-time service remains continuous.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.